Utah statutes.
53-3-902.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Motorcycle" has the same meaning as provided in Section 41-1a-102.

(2)  "Program" means the motorcycle rider education program for training and information disbursement created under Section  53-3-903.

(3)  "Rider training course" means a motorcycle rider education curriculum and delivery system approved by the division as meeting national standards designed to develop and instill the knowledge, attitudes, habits, and skills necessary for the safe operation of a motorcycle.

